apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="vak/ker__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>rare</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>rares</l>	<r>ker<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>res</l>	<r>ker<s n="n"/><s n="xpsts"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kert</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>raste</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>rastes</l>	<r>ker<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rast</l>	<r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/ille__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>verre</l>     <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>verres</l>     <r>ille<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ille</l>      <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>illes</l>      <r>ille<s n="n"/><s n="xpsts"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>verste</l>    <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>verstes</l>    <r>ille<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>verst</l>     <r>ille<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/ond__adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erre</l>  <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>erres</l>  <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondare</l><r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>ondares</l><r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ond</l>   <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondt</l>  <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>  <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>  <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>ondes</l>  <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="xpsts"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erste</l> <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>erstes</l> <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondaste</l><r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>ondastes</l><r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erst</l>  <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondast</l><r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dår/leg__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>leg</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leg</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lege</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lege</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>leges</l>         <r>leg<s n="n"/><s n="xpsts"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>legare</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>legares</l>       <r>leg<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>legast</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>legaste</l>      <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>legastes</l>      <r>leg<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lig</l>          <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lige</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lige</l>         <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>liges</l>         <r>leg<s n="n"/><s n="xpsts"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ligare</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>ligares</l>       <r>leg<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ligast</l>       <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ligaste</l>      <r>leg<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n" r="LR"> <p><l>ligastes</l>      <r>leg<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dårleg">          <i>dår</i><par n="dår/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lekker">          <i>lek</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sikker">          <i>sik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stilsikker">          <i>stilsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjølvsikker">          <i>sjølvsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skråsikker">      <i>skråsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="treffsikker">     <i>treffsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="usikker">         <i>usik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rassikker">       <i>rassik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vakker">          <i>vak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vond">            <i>v</i><par n="v/ond__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ille">            <par n="/ille__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naudvakker">	<i>naudvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="styggvakker">	<i>styggvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smellvakker">	<i>smellvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bælvakker">	<i>bælvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brennvakker">	<i>brennvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="snarvakker">	<i>snarvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andletsvakker">	<i>andletsvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ansiktsvakker">	<i>ansiktsvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bråvakker">	<i>bråvak</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smekker">	<i>smek</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nikker">	<i>nik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="eldsikker">	<i>eldsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bombesikker">	<i>bombesik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="telesikker">	<i>telesik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="barnesikker">	<i>barnesik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sklisikker">	<i>sklisik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trafikksikker">	<i>trafikksik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="møllsikker">	<i>møllsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bomsikker">	<i>bomsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brannsikker">	<i>brannsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brennsikker">	<i>brennsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="årsikker">	<i>årsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kollisjonssikker">	<i>kollisjonssik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="driftssikker">	<i>driftssik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="splintsikker">	<i>splintsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="idiotsikker">	<i>idiotsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skotsikker">	<i>skotsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skottsikker">	<i>skottsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tolleg">	<i>tol</i><par n="dår/leg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sigerssikker">	<i>sigerssik</i>	<par n="vak/ker__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="sprutsikker">	<i>sprutsik</i>	<par n="vak/ker__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="flammesikker">                   <i>flammesik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frostsikker">                    <i>frostsik</i><par n="vak/ker__adj"/></e>
